Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 2. Scrap Metal Dealer Record Requirements.

Effective dates. —

Section 3, ch. 67, SLA 2014 makes this article effective January 1, 2015.

Sec. 08.60.200.
Records required.

A scrap metal dealer shall maintain an accurate paper or electronic record of each in-person transaction in which the dealer purchases scrap metal for $100 or more from another person.

The record of a transaction must include

the date, time, location, and value of the scrap metal purchased;

the name of the dealer’s employee or agent handling the transaction;

the name, address, and telephone number of the person from whom the dealer purchased the scrap metal;

a description, including the license plate information, of a motor vehicle used to deliver the scrap metal to the dealer;

if the person who sells scrap metal to the dealer is an individual, the number of the individual’s driver’s license, the number of the individual’s government-issued identification document that contains a picture, or a copy of the individual’s government-issued identification document that contains a picture;

if the person who sells scrap metal to the dealer is an organization, the number of the person’s state business license issued under AS

43.70.020

;

a description, including weight and quantity, of the scrap metal purchased by the dealer; the scrap metal dealer shall determine the weight by using a scale that complies with the state standards of weight and measure established under AS 45.75; and

the signed statement required by AS

08.60.210

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 67 SLA 2014)

Sec. 08.60.210.
Signed statement.

A scrap metal dealer shall require a person from whom the dealer is purchasing scrap metal for $100 or more to sign a written or electronic statement that the scrap metal is not stolen property. The person shall date the statement, and the scrap metal dealer, or the dealer’s employee or agent, shall witness the person signing.

History.

(§ 1 ch 67 SLA 2014)

Sec. 08.60.220.
Inspection availability.

A dealer shall make the records required by AS

08.60.200

and

08.60.210

available for inspection by a law enforcement officer during the dealer’s regular hours of business or at reasonable times if the dealer does not keep regular hours of business.

History.

(§ 1 ch 67 SLA 2014)

Sec. 08.60.230.
Retention of records.

A dealer shall maintain the records of a transaction required by AS

08.60.200

and

08.60.210

for five years after the date of the transaction.

History.

(§ 1 ch 67 SLA 2014)

Sec. 08.60.240.
Exemptions.

The requirements of AS

08.60.200

and

08.60.210

do not apply to a person’s transactions with a dealer if the person maintains on file with the dealer the name, address, and telephone number of the person, and a taxpayer identification number issued by the federal Internal Revenue Service or a valid government-issued photo identification card.

History.

(§ 1 ch 67 SLA 2014)

Sec. 08.60.250.
Criminal penalties.

A dealer who knowingly fails to comply with AS

08.60.200

or

08.60.210

or a person who knowingly makes a false entry for a record required under AS

08.60.200

or

08.60.210

is guilty of a class A misdemeanor. In this section, “knowingly” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 67 SLA 2014)

Cross references. —

For punishment for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135

for imprisonment, and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 08.60.290.
Definitions.

In AS

08.60.200

—

08.60.290

, unless the context requires otherwise,

“dealer” means a scrap metal dealer;

“record” means a record required by AS

08.60.200

or

08.60.210

;

“scrap metal” means used, discarded, or previously owned brass, copper, bronze, aluminum, lead, stainless steel, catalytic converter material, or other metal; in this paragraph, “metal” does not include ferrous metal, beverage containers, gold, silver, or platinum;

“scrap metal dealer” means a person who purchases scrap metal for the purpose of resale or processing;

“transaction” means the purchase of scrap metal by a scrap metal dealer from another person.

History.

(§ 1 ch 67 SLA 2014)